Utah statutes.
15-9-114.   Prohibited conduct.

(1)  An athlete agent, with the intent to induce a student-athlete to enter into an agency contract, may not:

(a)  give any materially false or misleading information or make a materially false promise or representation;

(b)  furnish anything of value to a student-athlete before the student-athlete enters into the agency contract; or

(c)  furnish anything of value to any individual other than the student-athlete or another registered athlete agent.

(2)  An athlete agent may not intentionally:

(a)  initiate contact with a student-athlete unless registered under this chapter;

(b)  refuse or fail to retain or permit inspection of the records required to be retained by Section 15-9-113;

(c)  fail to register when required by Section 15-9-104;

(d)  provide materially false or misleading information in an application for registration or renewal of registration;

(e)  predate or postdate an agency contract; or

(f)  fail to notify a student-athlete before the student-athlete signs or otherwise authenticates an agency contract for a particular sport that the signing or authentication may make the student-athlete ineligible to participate as a student-athlete in that sport.

